Utah statutes.
53-7-216.   Portable fire extinguishers -- Certification required to
service.
(1)  Each firm engaged in the business of servicing portable fire
extinguishers or automatic fire suppression systems that automatically detect
fire and discharge an approved fire extinguishing agent onto or in the area of
the fire shall be certified by the state fire marshal.
(2)  An application for certification shall be in writing, on forms prescribed
by the board, and require evidence of competency.
(3)  The board may establish a fee under Section 63J-1-504 to be paid upon
application for certification.
(4)  This section does not apply to standpipe systems, deluge systems, or
automatic fire sprinkler systems.
